Illinois, session 104th, SB1686.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Justice Act is amended by 5adding Section 15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 155/15 new)7    Sec. 15. Environmental Justice Public Participation 8Program.9    (a) The purposes of the Environmental Justice Public 10Participation Program include:11        (1) ensuring that communities are not 12    disproportionately impacted by degradation of the 13    environment and do not receive less than an equitable 14    share of environmental protection and benefits; and15        (2) strengthening the public's involvement in 16    environmental permitting.17    (b) As used in this Section:18    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency. 19    "Area of environmental justice concern" means a census 20block group or area within one mile of a census block group 21that, in either case, has (i) an average household income that 22is less than the poverty guidelines updated periodically in 23the Federal Register by the U.S. Department of Health and   SB1686- 2 -LRB104 12085 BDA 22183 b1Human Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2) or 2(ii) a minority population that is greater than twice the 3statewide average.4    "EJ Start" means a geographic information system mapping 5tool developed by the Agency for the purpose of identifying 6census block groups and areas within one mile of census block 7groups meeting the environmental justice demographic screening 8criteria. EJ Start is the relevant environmental justice 9mapping tool for the Agency's environmental public 10participation and shall be updated with each federal decennial 11census.12    "Office of Environmental Justice" means the office within 13the Agency that has the primary responsibility for 14coordinating all environmental justice efforts set forth in 15this Act.16    (c) The Office of Environmental Justice shall:17        (1) act as the liaison for the Agency on environmental 18    justice issues;19        (2) conduct enhanced public outreach in areas of 20    environmental justice concern;21        (3) respond to general inquiries concerning 22    environmental justice; and23        (4) respond to public comments received on proposed 24    permitting actions raising environmental justice concerns.25    (d) The requirements of this Section apply to the 26following permitting actions within areas of environmental   SB1686- 3 -LRB104 12085 BDA 22183 b1justice concern as documented on EJ Start:2        (1) construction permits for new sources that would 3    require a Clean Air Act Permit Program (CAAPP) permit;4        (2) construction permits for new sources that would 5    require a Federally Enforceable State Operating Permit 6    (FESOP);7        (3) Nonattainment New Source Review permits, as 8    defined in Section 3.298 of the Environmental Protection 9    Act, for major modifications at existing sources; and10        (4) Prevention of Significant Deterioration permits, 11    as defined in Section 3.363 of the Environmental 12    Protection Act, for major modifications at existing 13    sources.14    (e) The Office of Environmental Justice shall use 15environmental justice notifications to contact inhabitants in 16areas of environmental justice concern, elected officials, and 17other interested parties to provide notice of a proposed 18permit action identified in paragraphs (1) through (4) of 19subsection (d) in that particular area of environmental 20justice concern. An environmental justice notification shall 21include the following information:22        (1) the facility name;23        (2) the facility address;24        (3) the Bureau identification number;25        (4) the permit application reference number;26        (5) a short summary of the proposed project;  SB1686- 4 -LRB104 12085 BDA 22183 b1        (6) public notice details of the permit if subject to 2    State or federal public notice requirements; and3        (7) Environmental Justice Coordinator contact 4    information.5    (f) If an area is not designated as an area of 6environmental justice concern due to an error in the Agency's 7application of EJ Start, a resident of that area may make a 8request in writing to the Agency for reconsideration of the 9designation upon providing the Office of Environmental Justice 10census data that would otherwise demonstrate the area is an 11area of environmental justice concern.12    If an area is designated as an area of environmental 13justice concern due to an error in the Agency's application of 14EJ Start, a resident of that area may make a request in writing 15to the Agency for reconsideration of the designation upon 16providing the Office of Environmental Justice census data that 17would otherwise demonstrate that the area is not an area of 18environmental justice concern. Such requests for 19reconsideration may also be made by a resident of that area in 20writing to the Agency demonstrating that the designation may 21negatively impact the area.22    (g) The following requirements apply to permitting 23transactions in areas of environmental justice concern:24        (1) The permit application shall include an 25    Environmental Impact Analysis, which shall include the 26    following information:  SB1686- 5 -LRB104 12085 BDA 22183 b1            (A) air dispersion modeling examining the air 2        quality-related impacts from the proposed project in 3        combination with existing mobile and stationary air 4        emitting sources at the facility; and5            (B) a quantitative analysis, based on the air 6        dispersion modeling, on the direct and indirect 7        impacts of the project on the community immediately 8        surrounding the facility.9        (2) In addition to any other fees imposed under this 10    Act, a fee of $500 shall accompany the permit application.11    (h) In compliance with 40 CFR Parts 5 and 7, the Agency 12shall establish a grievance procedure to ensure prompt and 13fair resolution of complaints alleging violations of Title VI, 14Section 601 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 or this Act.15        (1) A person, or the authorized representative of a 16    person, who believes that he or she or a class of persons 17    has been discriminated against in violation of Title VI, 18    Section 601 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 or this Act may 19    file a complaint with the Agency. The complaint shall:20            (A) be in writing;21            (B) be filed within 60 days of an alleged 22        violation of Title VI, Section 601 of the Civil Rights 23        Act of 1964 or this Act;24            (C) describe with specificity the actions by the 25        Agency that allegedly result in discrimination in 26        violation of 40 CFR Parts 5 and 7;  SB1686- 6 -LRB104 12085 BDA 22183 b1            (D) describe with specificity the discrimination 2        that allegedly has occurred or will occur as the 3        result of such action;4            (E) identify the parties impacted or potentially 5        impacted by the alleged discrimination; and6            (F) be addressed to Environmental Protection 7        Agency.8        (2) The Agency may waive the requirement in 9    subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) in order to address at 10    the earliest appropriate and feasible juncture or for good 11    cause allegations of potential discrimination caused by 12    pending actions.13        (3) Within 10 days of receiving a written complaint 14    under this subsection, the Agency shall provide the 15    complainant with written notice of receipt. At that time, 16    the Agency may request additional information needed to 17    complete the complaint. Within 10 days of receiving 18    additional information, the Agency shall provide the 19    complainant with written notice that the complaint is 20    complete.21        (4) The Agency, based on the complaint, shall 22    determine if it has jurisdiction to pursue the matter and 23    whether the complaint has sufficient merit to warrant an 24    investigation. A complaint shall be regarded as meriting 25    investigation unless:26            (A) on its face, the complaint appears frivolous   SB1686- 7 -LRB104 12085 BDA 22183 b1        and fraudulent;2            (B) within the time allotted for making the 3        determination of jurisdiction and investigative merit, 4        the Agency voluntarily concedes noncompliance and 5        agrees to take appropriate remedial action;6            (C) within the time allotted for making the 7        determination of jurisdiction and investigative merit, 8        the complainant withdraws the complaint; or9            (D) the complaint is not timely filed and good 10        cause does not exist for waiving the timing 11        requirement.12    (f) Within 120 days of accepting a written complaint, the 13Agency shall respond in writing to the complainant with a 14proposed resolution.15    (g) The Agency shall provide a report to the Commission on 16Environmental Justice annually regarding the status of all 17grievances made pursuant to this Section.